Utah statutes.
36-27-103.   Resolution of the Legislature -- Written statement.

(1)  The Legislature may provide any counsel or reporting requests under Section 36-27-102 by:

(a)  passing a joint resolution of the Legislature; or

(b)  issuing a written statement that contains the signatures of a majority of the members of the House and a majority of the members of the Senate.

(2)  A written statement under Subsection (1)(b) shall be referred to as "The Legislature's Counsel to United States Senators Representing Utah."

